Icelandic.dic
Alberta/435
Alexía/435
Ameríka/448
Angela/435
Antarktíka/448
Armenía/448
Arnhildur/434
Arín/433
Austur-Afríka/448
Austur-Evrópa/448
Axelma/435
Belgía/448
Bergrín/434
Birta/435
Björgheiður/434
Braghildur/434
Bretanía/448
Brigitta/435
Bíbí/433
Bóthildur/434
Búlgaría/448
Dalrós/433
Dorothea/435
Dögun/433
Dýrunn/434
Elma/435
Elínheiður/434
Elínrós/433
Elísabeth/433
Etíópía/448
Evalía/435
Evrópa/448
Eþíópía/448
Freydís/434
Freyja/435
Friðlín/433
Georgía/448
Gissunn/434
Gunnur/434
Gyðja/435
Hafrós/433
Hallgunnur/434
Hersegóvína/448
Hilligerður/434
Hind/433
Hrafnhildur/434
Hulda/435
Húndís/434
India/435
Inga/435
Ingirós/433
Irma/435
Iðunn/434
Jamaíka/448
Jóna/435
Jórunn/434
Jökulrós/433
Kenýa/448
Kládía/435
Kristrós/433
Kúba/448
Lilja/435
Lyngheiður/434
Lín/433
Lív/433
Lóa/435
Magnhildur/434
Malasía/448
Marísa/435
Melrós/433
Mið-Evrópa/448
Mjalldís/434
Moskva/448
Naomí/433
Norma/435
Norður-Ameríka/448
Norðurálfa/448
Náttsól/433
Oddfríður/434
Pálmfríður/434
Rita/435
Rut/433
Ráðhildur/434
Róslín/433
Samóa/448
Sigurósk/433
Snæfríður/434
Steina/435
Steinrós/433
Suðaustur-Asía/448
Suður-Evrópa/448
Svanrós/433
Sádi-Arabía/448
Sæhildur/434
Særós/433
Sóldögg/433
Teresía/435
Tóta/435
Venus/433
Vestur-Evrópa/448
Victoría/435
Vordís/434
affosfórun/439
afneitun/439
afréttari/432
afturbati/429
aleutíska/445
andagift/437
andalúsíska/445
andskoti/428
angan/437
ankannalegur/452
anló/437
annmarki/431
appelsínugulur/450
ari/431
aseíska/445
asmi/429
athuga/456
atvinnulaus/450
atvinnumennska/445
auglýsing/441
auglýsingastofa/443
auglýsingateiknari/432
aurskriða/447
auðn/436
aðalbygging/441
aðalkennari/432
aðalleiðsla/444
aðalréttur/427
aðdróttun/439
aðdáun/437
aðferðafræði/442
aðflutningsskýrsla/444
aðstoð/437
bakki/431
banki/431
barkspæta/443
barrfinka/447
bati/431
bembaíska/445
beyging/441
bifreið/436
bika/456
bilun/439
bjánalegur/452
blaðsíða/444
bláberjalyngrauði/428
blágrænn/453
blæðing/441
blíða/447
blómgun/439
blóðeitrun/439
blóðfrumnamyndun/439
blóðfræði/442
blóðheitur/450
blóðtappi/431
blóðvökvi/429
blöðrusytrur/446
bora/456
borgari/432
borða/456
brahíska/445
brauðsneið/440
breskur/450
breyta/447
brjósttaug/440
broddfura/443
brúnn/453
bursti/428
bylgjulengd/436
byrjun/439
byssa/447
byssukúla/444
bókari/432
bókbindari/432
bóklegur/452
bókmenntir/438
bólga/447
bólstrari/432
bólusetning/441
bómull/437
bótúlíneitrun/439
dauðdagi/431
dimma/445
dimmur/450
drekafluga/444
drepsótt/436
drottning/441
dráttartaug/440
dræsa/443
dulúð/437
dulúðlegur/452
dvergkráka/447
dæmalaus/451
dísilvél/440
dómari/432
dökkgrænn/453
dýr/451
dýratónfræði/442
dýrmætur/450
efi/429
eftirspurn/437
eiga/444
eign/436
einbúi/428
einfeldni/442
einlitur/450
einsöngvari/432
elda/456
eldflaug/440
elfa/443
elli/442
elska/456
elskulegur/452
ending/441
endurlífgun/439
enskur/450
eplakjarni/431
erta/444
eyrnabólga/445
eyrugla/447
eðlisfræði/442
fannhvítur/450
farsæll/453
feigð/437
feitur/450
fela/447
felling/441
ferð/436
ferðatölva/443
fiskafræði/442
fjallafinka/447
fjalldrapi/429
fjandsamlegur/452
fjári/428
flauta/447
flikka/456
fluga/444
flugvél/440
flækja/443
flétta/456
forkaupsréttur/427
formálalaus/451
forn/451
fornenska/445
fornleif/440
fornnorrænn/453
forsöngvari/432
forvitni/442
fosfórun/439
framkvæmanlegur/452
frelsari/432
friðsæll/453
frjáls/451
frumburður/427
frumeindarkjarni/431
fræiritgerð/436
frændi/428
fræðigrein/440
fréttaritari/432
frískneska/445
fuglafræði/442
fuglaglæða/447
fundur/427
fyrirlitlegur/452
fátækur/450
fær/451
fínn/453
fóstureyðing/441
fölur/450
föðurlandssvikari/432
gagnfræðaskóli/428
galdraþula/444
galli/431
gammageislun/437
garðasól/436
garðyrkjulegur/452
geimi/429
geta/443
geðheilsa/445
geðveikur/450
gleym-mér-ei/440
gleymmérei/440
gleymni/442
grafalvarlegur/452
gransöngvari/432
grasafræði/442
grasgrænn/453
grunlaus/450
grunnskóli/428
grágrænn/453
grágæs/436
gráskrofa/447
græneðla/443
grænn/453
gæfa/445
haglabyssa/447
hali/431
hannyrðir/438
harðsperrur/446
heilablæðing/441
heili/428
heill/453
heimild/436
heimilisfræði/442
heimsborgari/432
heimsálfa/443
heitur/450
helgi/442
hernaðarlegur/452
hettusótt/437
heyrnarlaus/451
hilling/441
hirsla/444
hjarta-lungnalífgun/439
hjálpsemi/442
hljóma/456
hljóðholsbólga/445
hlutdeild/436
hlíf/440
hneta/443
hnotsörvi/428
hraði/431
hrefna/443
hreinn/453
hreinsun/439
hringdúfa/444
hryggjarliður/427
hrynjandi/429
hryssa/447
hugdirfð/437
hughreysti/442
hughreysting/441
hugskotssjónir/438
hugsun/439
hunangsfluga/444
hvatskeytslegur/452
hvíslari/432
hygð/436
hádegisverður/427
hálfdvali/429
hárbursti/428
hás/451
háskalaus/450
hávær/451
hæstiréttur/427
hóra/443
hósta/456
hósti/429
höfuðkúpa/447
húfa/456
indónesíska/445
innkirtlafræði/442
iðgrænn/453
iðjagrænn/453
jarðkjarni/431
jökulsprunga/444
jökulurð/436
kalsíumblokki/428
kampasöngvari/432
kanína/443
karsi/429
kasmírska/445
kassi/431
kinn/440
kirtilaugnfró/437
kjánalegur/452
kjötæta/447
klettadoppa/443
klifra/456
knattspyrnudómari/432
komutími/428
kornbreska/445
kosning/441
krabbi/431
kreppa/444
kurteis/451
kveikja/443
kverk/440
kvöldverður/427
kyrr/451
kær/451
kærleiki/429
kólibrísvarmi/431
kóngsfiskari/432
kúrdíska/445
landafræði/442
landareign/436
landlægur/450
laufglói/428
laug/440
laus/451
lenging/441
leyfilegur/452
leðurhúð/436
listmálari/432
litháíska/445
litlaus/451
ljósgrænn/453
ljóshraði/429
ljóska/447
ljósmengun/437
ljóðrænn/453
loftæð/440
logi/428
loðfluga/444
lungnaþemba/443
lykt/436
líffræði/442
líkami/431
lömun/437
lýndíska/445
maltneska/445
margvíslegur/452
meinafræði/442
melding/441
menntaskóli/428
meðvitund/437
minnisvarði/431
miðkjúka/443
mjallahvítur/450
mjaðjurt/436
mosi/428
moskítófluga/444
munaðarlaus/451
myndavél/440
myndrænn/453
mælieining/441
mænukylfa/447
mýfluga/444
nauðgun/439
netlusöngvari/432
nifteind/436
norrænn/453
norska/445
nábúi/428
nákvæmur/450
nál/440
náttúrufegurð/437
næturgali/431
nýlegur/452
orðsifjafræði/442
ostra/443
paradís/437
penni/428
pennsylvaníu-þýska/445
perla/447
pjönkur/446
prentari/432
prófun/439
pynting/441
páskar/430
póstkassi/431
púki/428
raunveruleiki/429
regnbogahimna/443
regnhlíf/440
regnskúr/436
rjúpa/444
ropa/456
rotta/447
rugga/456
ráðning/441
réttur/427
ríkisborgari/432
rómverskur/450
rósastari/431
rökfræðilegur/452
sagnmynd/436
samloðun/437
sannleiki/428
seinn/453
sigling/441
sikileyska/445
simpansi/431
sin/440
sjávarlíffræði/442
sjónskekkja/443
skapraun/436
skaðlaus/451
skeið/440
skemmtun/439
skipa/456
skorpa/444
skrifa/456
skrofa/447
skrækskaði/431
skuggi/428
skynsemi/442
skáldlegur/452
skær/451
skógarblámi/429
skóáburður/427
slagæð/440
sláttarstöðvun/439
slóð/436
smiðja/443
snilld/437
snjóhvítur/450
snædrottning/441
sofna/456
sopi/428
spésöngvari/432
spítali/431
staðhæfing/441
stríða/444
stærðfræði/442
stóismi/429
stóreygur/450
stórmerkilegur/452
sumargrænn/453
svartspæta/443
svefnlaus/451
svefíska/445
svigi/428
svikamylla/444
sviti/429
sálufélagi/431
sápa/447
sægrænn/453
sæll/453
sígrænn/453
síma/456
sólarupprás/436
súr/451
sýking/441
tannlaus/451
taugafruma/447
teiknari/432
telpa/444
tileinkun/439
tilfinning/441
tilgangslaus/451
tilvitnun/439
titra/456
toga/456
traustleiki/429
tregur/450
trjágrein/440
truflun/439
trúrækni/442
tál/440
tæknilegur/452
tíbetska/445
tígulþerna/443
tónlist/437
töfrasproti/428
tölvunarfræði/442
umbúðir/438
undirskrift/436
upphrópun/439
uppruni/429
uppspretta/444
vala/447
vangi/431
varmi/429
varúð/437
vefari/432
verzlun/439
vilji/429
vinsældir/438
vinsæll/453
virkilegur/452
virkur/450
virðing/441
vitlaus/451
vitleysa/443
vitnaleiðsla/444
vodki/429
vona/456
Ásrós/433
Íris/434
Þyrnirós/437
áburður/427
ábyrgðarlaus/451
áhugi/429
áminning/441
ár/440
árangurslaus/451
árvekni/442
ástæða/444
ásættanlegur/452
átt/436
áætlun/439
ætla/456
æða/447
íris/437
íslenska/445
íslenskur/450
ísmoli/428
ódýr/451
óeirðir/438
óendaleiki/429
ógeðslegur/452
óhreinn/453
ólífa/443
ónotalegur/452
óska/456
ósæð/440
óttalaus/451
óvinsæll/453
óyfirstíganlegur/452
öfund/437
öruggur/450
örvilnun/439
úrhellisrigning/441
útdauði/429
útskolun/437
þerra/456
þeysireið/436
þokki/429
þorsti/429
þvottavél/440
þyrla/444
þyrla/456
þérun/439
